Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1276.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 18-202, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE18-202. Obligations of state agencies obtaining information online An agency web site provided by this state shall contain a privacy policy statement to disclose the information gathering and dissemination practices related to the internet. The privacy policy statement shall describe at a minimum the agency's information practices with regard to the following matters: 1. What services the site provides. 2. The information the agency obtains from individuals on line online. 3. A person's option to choose to proceed with the transaction and any alternatives available. 4. How the agency uses the information. 5. Whether and under what circumstances the agency discloses the obtained information to other entities or persons. 6. Whether other entities or persons are collecting information through the agency web site. 7. A general description of the security measures in place to protect a person's information without compromising the integrity of the security measures. END_STATUTE